Hawaii statutes.
§710-1061 False swearing in official
matters. (1) A person commits the offense of false swearing in official
matters if the person makes, under an oath required or authorized by law, a
false statement which the person does not believe to be true, and:

(a) The statement is made in an official proceeding;
or

(b) The statement is intended to mislead a public
servant in the performance of the public servant's official duty.

(2) False swearing in official matters is a
misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next